Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-153
County board; joint sessions; mileage reimbursement.

(1) The county boards of two or more counties may meet and hold joint sessions for the transaction of joint county business, including, but not limited to, consolidation agreements pursuant to sections 22-401 to 22-416 and 22-418.

(2) When traveling to and from any county board meeting, members of the county board may be reimbursed for mileage at the rate provided in section 81-1176.

Laws 1879, § 56, p. 370;

R.S.1913, § 981;

C.S.1922, § 881;

C.S.1929, § 26-135;

R.S.1943, § 23-153;

Laws 1969, c. 149, § 1, p. 707;

Laws 1984, LB 671, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1011, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 1085, § 28;

Laws 1997, LB 40, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 269, § 29.